Hawaii statutes.
§396-19 Hoisting machine operators advisory
board. (a) There is created a hoisting machine operators advisory board,
which shall be placed in the department for administrative purposes, to be
composed of five members to serve without compensation and without
reimbursement for expenses. Members shall be appointed by the governor under
section 26-34.

The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter
91 for the certification of hoisting machine operators.

(b) The hoisting machine operators advisory
board may employ a 0.5 full-time equivalent office assistant, without regard to
chapters 76 and 89 and may dismiss such person as it finds necessary for the
performance of its function and duties. The board shall have the authority to
fix the office assistant's compensation. [L 1998, c 165, pt of §2; am L 2002, c
222, §2; am L 2016, c 74, §1]

Note

Report to 2017 legislature on state law and federal
Occupational Safety and Health Administration rules and regulations pertaining
to hoisting machine operators; certification of hoisting machine operators. L
2016, c 74, §3.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next